Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2094.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5666XS (4) 91 jda/jh S.F. 2094 Section 1. Section 256.7, subsection 26, paragraph a, 1 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 Adopt a core curriculum and adopt rules that establish high 4 school graduation requirements for all students in school 5 districts and accredited nonpublic schools that include at a 6 minimum satisfactory completion of four years of English and 7 language arts, three years of mathematics, three years of 8 science, and three years of social studies , and, beginning with 9 students in the 2030-2031 school year graduating class, one 10 semester of computer science and artificial intelligence, or 11 the trimester or quarter equivalent, which may include computer 12 science instruction provided in grade eight pursuant to section 13 256.11, subsection 4 . 14 Sec. 2. Section 256.7, subsection 26, paragraph a, 15 subparagraph (4), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 (4) The rules shall provide for the establishment of 17 high-quality standards for computer science and artificial 18 intelligence education taught by elementary, middle, and high 19 schools, in accordance with the goal established under section 20 284.6A, subsection 1 , setting a foundation for personal and 21 professional success in a high-technology, knowledge-based Iowa 22 economy. The high-quality standards for computer science and 23 artificial intelligence education must require that all levels 24 and grades of computer science and artificial intelligence 25 instruction include instruction related to the fundamental 26 concepts of evolving computer science technologies and 27 artificial intelligence, including instruction that explains 28 what artificial intelligence is, how artificial intelligence 29 works, how to design artificial intelligence, how artificial 30 intelligence impacts society, and ethical considerations 31 related to the use of artificial intelligence. 32 Sec. 3. Section 256.9, subsection 61, Code 2026, is amended 33 to read as follows: 34 61. Develop and implement a statewide kindergarten through 35 -1- LSB 5666XS (4) 91 jda/jh 1/ 16 S.F. 2094 grade twelve computer science and artificial intelligence 1 instruction plan by July 1, 2022 . 2 Sec. 4. Section 256.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 3 following new subsections: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 80. On or before June 30, 2027, publish 5 on the departmentâs internet site a list of computer science 6 and artificial intelligence courses that satisfy the rules 7 adopted by the state board pursuant to section 256.7, 8 subsection 32, paragraph âcâ , and that a school district 9 or accredited nonpublic school may use to implement the 10 graduation requirement described in section 256.11, subsection 11 5, paragraph âlâ , subparagraph (2). The list must include 12 the names of the computer science and artificial intelligence 13 courses and the course codes associated with each computer 14 science and artificial intelligence course. 15 NEW SUBSECTION . 81. Publish on the departmentâs internet 16 site all of the information submitted to the department by 17 school districts pursuant to section 256.11, subsection 5, 18 paragraph âlâ , subparagraph (3). 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 82. On or before June 30, 2027, create 20 and publish on the departmentâs internet site a plan to 21 expand statewide computer science and artificial intelligence 22 teacher capacity to support implementation of the graduation 23 requirement described in section 256.11, subsection 5, 24 paragraph âlâ , subparagraph (2). The plan must specifically 25 address targeted support for schools with a total enrollment of 26 less than five hundred students in grades nine through twelve. 27 When creating the plan, the department shall invite input from 28 representatives of kindergarten through grade twelve schools, 29 including students, computer science teacher professional 30 development providers, industries that employ technology 31 workers, and higher education institutions that offer computer 32 science teacher preparation pathways. 33 Sec. 5. Section 256.11, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 34 2026, is amended to read as follows: 35 -2- LSB 5666XS (4) 91 jda/jh 2/ 16 S.F. 2094 b. Computer science and artificial intelligence instruction 1 incorporating the standards established under section 256.7, 2 subsection 26 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (4), shall be 3 offered in at least one grade level commencing with the school 4 year beginning July 1, 2023 . 5 Sec. 6. Section 256.11, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 6 2026, is amended to read as follows: 7 b. Computer science and artificial intelligence instruction 8 incorporating the standards established under section 256.7, 9 subsection 26 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (4), shall be 10 offered in at least one grade level commencing with the 11 school year beginning July 1, 2023 . Career exploration 12 and development shall be designed so that students are 13 appropriately prepared to create an individual career 14 and academic plan pursuant to section 279.61 , incorporate 15 foundational career and technical education concepts aligned 16 with the six career and technical education service areas as 17 defined in subsection 5 , paragraph âhâ , incorporate relevant 18 twenty-first century skills to facilitate career readiness, and 19 introduce students to career opportunities within the local 20 community and across this state. 21 Sec. 7. Section 256.11, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 22 by adding the following new paragraph: 23 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. Career exploration and development 24 shall be designed so that students are appropriately prepared 25 to create an individual career and academic plan pursuant to 26 section 279.61, incorporate foundational career and technical 27 education concepts aligned with the six career and technical 28 education service areas as defined in subsection 5, paragraph 29 âhâ , incorporate relevant twenty-first century skills to 30 facilitate career readiness, and introduce students to career 31 opportunities within the local community and across this state. 32 Sec. 8. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 33 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 34 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (3) The five units of science may include 35 -3- LSB 5666XS (4) 91 jda/jh 3/ 16 S.F. 2094 not more than one unit of instruction related to computer 1 science and artificial intelligence. 2 Sec. 9. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraphs e and l, 3 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 4 e. Two additional units of mathematics. 5 (1) The two additional units of mathematics may include 6 instruction related to applied sciences, technology, 7 engineering, or manufacturing, including transportation, 8 distribution, logistics, architecture, and construction, which 9 may be offered and taught through dedicated units of coursework 10 or through units of coursework that also meet the requirements 11 of the coursework required under paragraph âhâ , subparagraph 12 (1), subparagraph division (c). The state board shall adopt 13 rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement this paragraph. 14 (2) The two additional units of mathematics may include not 15 more than one unit of instruction related to computer science 16 and artificial intelligence. 17 (3) The state board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 18 17A to implement this paragraph. 19 l. (1) One-half unit of computer science commencing 20 with the school year beginning July 1, 2022 and artificial 21 intelligence . The one-half unit of computer science and 22 artificial intelligence shall incorporate the standards 23 established pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 26 , paragraph 24 âaâ , subparagraph (4) , and may be offered online in accordance 25 with rules adopted pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 32 , 26 paragraph âaâ . The one-half unit of computer science and 27 artificial intelligence shall satisfy all of the following 28 requirements: 29 (a) Be of high quality. 30 (b) Meet or exceed the curriculum standards and 31 requirements established by the state board. 32 (c) Be offered and taught in a traditional classroom 33 setting; provided, however, that if a traditional classroom 34 setting is not feasible, the one-half unit of computer science 35 -4- LSB 5666XS (4) 91 jda/jh 4/ 16 S.F. 2094 and artificial intelligence may be offered and taught in any 1 of the following ways: 2 (i) Through a combination of instruction that is delivered 3 in a traditional classroom setting and instruction that is 4 delivered primarily over the internet. 5 (ii) Through instruction that is delivered primarily over 6 the internet in accordance with rules adopted by the state 7 board pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 32, paragraph 8 âaâ , and is tailored to meet the needs of each participating 9 student. 10 (2) (a) All students, beginning with students in the 11 2030-2031 school year graduating class, shall complete one-half 12 unit of computer science and artificial intelligence as a 13 condition of graduation, which shall incorporate the standards 14 established pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 26, paragraph 15 âaâ , subparagraph (4), and which may include computer science 16 instruction provided in grade eight pursuant to section 17 256.11, subsection 4. The condition of graduation shall not 18 apply to a student who enrolls in a school district or an 19 accredited nonpublic school in grade twelve immediately after 20 being enrolled in a school located outside of this state that 21 does not impose a comparable computer science and artificial 22 intelligence instruction requirement. 23 (b) (i) On or before July 1, 2030, a school district or 24 accredited nonpublic school may apply to the department of 25 education for a one-time waiver of the implementation of the 26 condition of graduation described in this subparagraph. The 27 waiver shall be for a period not longer than one school year. 28 (ii) The state board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 29 17A establishing standards for the submission of applications 30 for waivers of the implementation of the condition of 31 graduation described in this subparagraph and the departmentâs 32 consideration and approval of waivers. The rules must 33 require that the department of education may only approve an 34 application for a waiver submitted pursuant to subparagraph 35 -5- LSB 5666XS (4) 91 jda/jh 5/ 16 S.F. 2094 subdivision (i) if the school district or accredited nonpublic 1 school applying for the waiver demonstrates to the department 2 that the school district or accredited nonpublic school made 3 a reasonable attempt to implement the condition of graduation 4 described in this subparagraph. 5 (iii) This subparagraph division is repealed July 1, 2031. 6 (3) Each school district shall report annually to the 7 department all of the following: 8 (a) The course names and course codes associated with all 9 computer science and artificial intelligence courses offered 10 and taught in the school district pursuant to this paragraph 11 and, to the extent such information is available, a description 12 of the format in which each course is offered and taught. 13 (b) The number of teachers employed by the school district 14 who teach computer science and artificial intelligence 15 instruction, sortable by the endorsements and authorizations 16 held by each teacher and the highest academic degree attained 17 by each teacher. The report shall not include any personally 18 identifiable information related to the teachers employed by 19 the school district who teach computer science and artificial 20 intelligence instruction. 21 (c) The number of students enrolled in a computer science 22 and artificial intelligence course offered and taught by the 23 school district pursuant to this paragraph, sortable by the 24 grade level of each student. The report shall not include any 25 personally identifiable information related to the students 26 enrolled in a computer science and artificial intelligence 27 course offered and taught by the school district. 28 Sec. 10. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph h, Code 29 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 30 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (04) Units of instruction provided 31 under subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (b) or (c), may 32 include up to one unit of instruction related to computer 33 science and artificial intelligence, if the teacher providing 34 such instruction has either an initial career and technical 35 -6- LSB 5666XS (4) 91 jda/jh 6/ 16 S.F. 2094 education authorization issued by the board of educational 1 examiners or a career and technical education authorization 2 issued by the board of educational examiners. 3 Sec. 11. Section 256.11, subsection 17, paragraph a, 4 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 (2) If a school district or accredited nonpublic school 6 meets the requirements of subparagraph (1), subparagraph 7 division (a) or (b), the school district or accredited 8 nonpublic school may exceed the two-subject limitation 9 specified in subparagraph (1), unnumbered paragraph 1, for the 10 purpose of providing world language, personal finance literacy, 11 and computer science and artificial intelligence coursework 12 online in accordance with paragraph âcâ . 13 Sec. 12. Section 256.13, Code 2026, is amended to read as 14 follows: 15 256.13 Nonresident pupils. 16 The boards of directors of two or more school districts may 17 by agreement provide for attendance of pupils residing in one 18 district in the schools of another district for the purpose of 19 taking courses not offered in the district of their residence , 20 including computer science and artificial intelligence courses 21 described in section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âlâ . The 22 boards may also provide by agreement that the districts will 23 combine their enrollments for one or more grades. Courses 24 and grades made available to students in this manner shall be 25 considered as complying with any standards or laws requiring 26 the offering of such courses and grades. The boards of 27 directors of districts entering into such agreements may 28 provide for sharing the costs and expenses of the courses. If 29 the agreement provides for whole grade sharing, the costs and 30 expenses shall be paid as provided in sections 282.10 through 31 282.12 . 32 Sec. 13. Section 256.16, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 33 by adding the following new paragraph: 34 NEW PARAGRAPH . p. Include preparation in computer science, 35 -7- LSB 5666XS (4) 91 jda/jh 7/ 16 S.F. 2094 artificial intelligence, and computational thinking that is 1 appropriate to the grade level and subject area in which 2 the student who is enrolled in the practitioner preparation 3 program will teach. A higher education institution providing 4 practitioner preparation may satisfy this requirement by 5 requiring a student who is enrolled in the practitioner 6 preparation program to complete a dedicated course or 7 module, or by integrating such preparation into the existing 8 practitioner preparation program. 9 Sec. 14. Section 256.146, subsection 19, Code 2026, is 10 amended to read as follows: 11 19. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A establishing 12 endorsements and authorizations for computer science and 13 artificial intelligence instruction , including . The rules 14 shall include traditional and nontraditional pathways for 15 obtaining such endorsements or authorizations , including 16 through instruction that is delivered primarily over the 17 internet that may be used to demonstrate competence in computer 18 science and artificial intelligence instruction for teachers 19 under an initial or conditional license . 20 Sec. 15. Section 262.9, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 21 to read as follows: 22 3. a. Make rules for admission to and for the government of 23 said the institutions of higher learning , not inconsistent with 24 law. 25 b. The rules described in paragraph âaâ must require that, 26 if an applicant for admission to an institution of higher 27 learning uses a computer science and artificial intelligence 28 course to fulfill any requirements related to units of science 29 instruction under section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âaâ , 30 subparagraph (3), or any requirements related to units of 31 mathematics instruction under section 256.11, subsection 5, 32 paragraph âeâ , subparagraph (2), then the institution of higher 33 learning must accept the unit or units of instruction related 34 to computer science and artificial intelligence as equivalent 35 -8- LSB 5666XS (4) 91 jda/jh 8/ 16 S.F. 2094 to the corresponding science or mathematics unit of instruction 1 for purposes of the calculation of the regent admission index. 2 Sec. 16. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 3 following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 43. Develop, in consultation with the 5 institutions of higher education governed by the board, 6 guidance related to how a higher education institution 7 providing practitioner preparation can best incorporate 8 preparation related to computer science, artificial 9 intelligence, and computational thinking into the approved 10 practitioner preparation program, as required under section 11 256.16, subsection 1, paragraph âpâ , and distribute such 12 guidance to each higher education institution providing 13 practitioner preparation. 14 Sec. 17. Section 280.3, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 15 to read as follows: 16 3. The board of directors of each public school district 17 and the authorities in charge of each nonpublic school shall 18 develop and implement a kindergarten through grade twelve 19 computer science and artificial intelligence plan by July 1, 20 2022, which that incorporates the standards established under 21 section 256.7, subsection 26 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (4), 22 and the minimum educational standards relating to computer 23 science and artificial intelligence contained in section 24 256.11 . 25 Sec. 18. Section 284.6A, subsection 1, paragraphs a and b, 26 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 27 a. That instruction in high-quality computer science and 28 artificial intelligence for elementary, middle school, and 29 high school students establishes a foundation for personal and 30 professional success in a high-technology, knowledge-based Iowa 31 economy. 32 b. It is the goal of the general assembly that by July 33 1, 2019, each accredited high school offer at least one 34 high-quality computer science and artificial intelligence 35 -9- LSB 5666XS (4) 91 jda/jh 9/ 16 S.F. 2094 course, each accredited middle school offer instruction in 1 exploratory computer science and artificial intelligence , and 2 each accredited elementary school offer instruction in the 3 basics of computer science and artificial intelligence . 4 Sec. 19. Section 284.6A, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 5 by adding the following new paragraph: 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. In order to provide students with the 7 competencies to compete in a twenty-first century workforce, 8 develop skills that translate into high-wage jobs, develop 9 problem solving and critical thinking skills, and encourage 10 the creation and retention of new, high-wage jobs in this 11 state, all high school students enrolled in school districts 12 or accredited nonpublic schools, beginning with the 2030-2031 13 school year graduating class, students should complete one 14 semester of computer science and artificial intelligence 15 as a condition of graduation as required by section 256.7, 16 subsection 26, paragraph âaâ . 17 Sec. 20. Section 284.6A, subsection 2, paragraphs a and b, 18 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 19 a. A school district or accredited nonpublic school, or 20 a collaborative of one or more school districts, accredited 21 nonpublic schools, and area education agencies, may apply to 22 the department, in the manner prescribed by the department, to 23 receive moneys from the fund to provide proven professional 24 development activities for Iowa teachers in the area of 25 computer science and artificial intelligence education. 26 b. A school district or accredited nonpublic school may 27 apply to the department, in the manner prescribed by the 28 department, to receive moneys from the fund to provide tuition 29 reimbursement for Iowa teachers , including Iowa teachers under 30 an initial or conditional license, seeking endorsements or 31 authorizations for computer science and artificial intelligence 32 under section 256.146, subsection 19 . 33 Sec. 21. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 34 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 35 -10- LSB 5666XS (4) 91 jda/jh 10/ 16 S.F. 2094 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 1 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 2 received by the school district under section 257.16, and from 3 any grants received under the computer science professional 4 development fund established pursuant to section 284.6A. This 5 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 6 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 7 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 8 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 9 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 10 districts. 11 Sec. 22. APPLICABILITY. The following applies to students 12 admitted to an approved practitioner preparation program on or 13 after July 1, 2028: 14 The section of this Act amending section 256.16. 15